Utah statutes.
39-6-63.   Sentence -- Remission or suspension.

(1)  A convening authority may remit or suspend any part or amount of the unexecuted portion of the sentence, including all uncollected forfeitures.

(2)  The governor may for good cause shown substitute an administrative form of a discharge for a bad conduct discharge or dismissal executed under a military court sentence.

